src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON PXPL2_OtOk
@U.PX.PL2@:@U.PX.PL2@%>%{eoö%}t%{eoö%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
!00000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2t%^Ö2k@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL3_k
@U.PX.PL3@:@U.PX.PL3@%>k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
LEXICON PXPL3_jUk
@U.PX.PL3@:@U.PX.PL3@%>j%{uü%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
!0000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>jük@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
LEXICON PXPL3_Uk
@U.PX.PL3@:@U.PX.PL3@%>%{uü%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
!000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ük@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_
PXSG1_m ;
PXSG2_d ;
 PXSG3_ZERO ;
PXPL1_nk ;
PXPL2_tOk ;
PXPL3_k ;

LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS
 NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE ;
 ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01 ;

LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3-SG
+Acc:%^V2VV%>t NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Nom: NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
:%^V2VV NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE ;
:%^V2VV ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01 ;

LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3-PL
+Acc:%>t NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Nom: NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
 NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE ;
 ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01 ;

LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_
+Nom: NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
 NOUN_CASE ;
 ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01 ;
LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01
+Der/Poss_N+Sg:%>é NOUN_CASE ;
+Der/Poss_N+Pl:%>é%>i NOUN_CASE ;

LEXICON NOUN_CASE
+Acc:%>%{ae%}t NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Acc000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>at@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Acc000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>et@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
 NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE ;
LEXICON NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE
+Abl000:%>t%{óő%}l NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Abl000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>től@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ade000:%>n%{áé%}l NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Ade000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>nél@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+All000:%>h%{eoö%}z NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+All000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>h%^Ö2z@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Cau:%>ért NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Dat:%>n%{ae%}k NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Dat000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>nek@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Del000:%>r%{óő%}l NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Del000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ről@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ela:%>b%{óő%}l NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Ela000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ből@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ess/F:%>ként NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ess/M00:%>%{uü%}l NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Ess/M00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ül@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ill00:%>b%{ae%} NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Ill00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>be@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ine000:%>b%{ae%}n NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Ine000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ben@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ins000:%>%^V2%{ae%}l NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Ins000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^V2el@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ses00:%>%{eoö%}n NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Ses00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2n@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Sla00:%>r%{ae%} NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Sla00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>re@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ter:%>ig NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Tra00:%>%^V2%{áé%} NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
!+Tra00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^V2é@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON NOUN_PX-OR-NOT
@R.PX@ NOUN_PX ;
@D.PX@ # ;

LEXICON	 NOUN_PX
@U.PX.SG1@+PxSg1:@U.PX.SG1@ # ;
@U.PX.SG2@+PxSg2:@U.PX.SG2@ # ;
@U.PX.SG3@+PxSg3:@U.PX.SG3@ # ;
@U.PX.PL1@+PxPl1:@U.PX.PL1@ # ;
@U.PX.PL2@+PxPl2:@U.PX.PL2@ # ;
@U.PX.PL3@+PxPl3:@U.PX.PL3@ # ;


LEXICON Cases

+N+Sg+Nom:     #   ;
+N+Sg+Acc:t    #   ;
+N+Sg+Loc:ben    #   ;

#:   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
